Washington statutes.
RCW 36.75.290

General penalty.

It shall be a misdemeanor for any person to violate any of the provisions of this title relating to county roads and bridges unless such violation is by this title or other law of this state declared to be a felony or gross misdemeanor.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.75.290. Prior: 1943 c 82 s 13, part; 1937 c 187 s 66, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6450-66, part.]